Mississippi, session 2026, HB1524.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 23-15-1037, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 23-15-1037.  (1)  The State of Mississippi is hereby divided into four (4) congressional districts below: FIRST DISTRICT.   The First Congressional District shall be composed of the following counties and portions of counties: Alcorn, Benton, Calhoun, Chickasaw, Choctaw, Clay, DeSoto, Itawamba, Lafayette, Lee, Lowndes, Marshall, Monroe, Pontotoc, Prentiss, Tate, Tippah, Tishomingo, Union, Webster; in Oktibbeha County, the precincts of Self Creek/Double Springs, Maben and *Sturgis/North Bradley. SECOND DISTRICT.   The Second Congressional District shall be composed of the following counties and portions of counties: Adams, Amite, Attala, Bolivar, Carroll, Claiborne, Coahoma, Copiah, Franklin, Grenada, Holmes, Humphreys, Issaquena, Jefferson, Leake, Leflore, Montgomery, Panola, Quitman, Sharkey, Sunflower, Tallahatchie, Tunica, Warren, Washington, Wilkinson, Yalobusha, Yazoo; in Hinds County Precincts 1, 2, 4, 6, 10, 11, 12, 13, *16, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30, 31, 37, 38, 39, 40, 41, 42, 43, 45, *46, 47, 49, 50, 51, 52, 54, 55, 56, 57, 58, 59, 60, 61, 62, 63, 64, 67, 68, 69, 70, 71, 72, 73, 74, 75, 76, 77, 79, 80, 81, 82, 83, 84, 85, 86, 87, 88, 89, 90, 91, 92, 93, 94, 95, 96, 97, and the precincts of Bolton, Brownsville, Byram 1, Byram 2, Byram 3, Cayuga, Chapel Hill, Clinton 1, Clinton 2, Clinton 3, Clinton 4, Clinton 5, Clinton 6, Clinton 7, Cynthia, Dry Grove, Edwards, Learned, Old Byram, Pine Haven, Pocahontas, Raymond 1, Raymond 2, Spring Ridge, St. Thomas, Terry 1, Terry 2, Tinnin, Utica 1 and Utica 2; in Madison County the precincts of Anderson Lodge, Camden, Cameron, Canton Bible Church, Canton Catholic Parish Center, Canton Community Center, Canton Fire Station #4, *Canton National Guard Armory, Canton South Liberty, Canton St. Paul Methodist, Cedar Grove, *Colonial Heights, Couparle, Farmhaven Fire Station, Greater Mt. Levi Church, Madison County Baptist Family Life Center, Magnolia Heights, Mount Hope, Pleasant Gift Church, Pleasant Green, Tougaloo. THIRD DISTRICT.   The Third Congressional District shall be composed of the following counties and portions of counties: Clarke, Covington, Jasper, Jefferson Davis, Kemper, Lauderdale, Lawrence, Lincoln, Marion, Neshoba, Newton, Noxubee, Pike, Rankin, Scott, Simpson, Smith, Walthall, Winston; in Hinds County the precincts of 8, 9, 14, *16, 17, 32, 33, 34, 35, 36, 44, *46 and 78; in Jones County the precincts of Matthews, Shady Grove, Sharon, and Sandersville Civic Center; in Madison County the precincts of First Presbyterian, *Canton National Guard Armory, China Grove, *Colonial Heights, Fellowship Baptist Church, Ferns Chapel Freewill, First Baptist, Franklin Bible Church, Gluckstadt, Grace Crossing, Highland Colony Baptist Church, Lake Caroline Clubhouse, Mark Apartments, New Life, NorthBay, Parkway Church, Ridgeland First Methodist Church, Ridgeland Recreational Center, SunnyBrook, Trace Ridge, Twin Lakes Baptist, Vertical Church, Victory Baptist Church and Victory Christian; in Oktibbeha County the precincts of Bell Schoolhouse, Center Grove/North Adaton, Central Starkville, Craig Springs/South Bradley, East Starkville, Hickory Grove/Southeast Oktibbeha, Needmore Voting District, North Longview, North Starkville 2, North Starkville 3, Oktoc, Osborn, Sessums, South Adaton, South Longview, South Starkville, *Sturgis/North Bradley and West Starkville. FOURTH DISTRICT.   The Fourth Congressional District shall be composed of the following counties and portions of counties: Forrest, George, Greene, Hancock, Harrison, Jackson, Lamar, Pearl River, Perry, Stone, Wayne; in Jones County the precincts of Antioch, Blackwell, Bruce, Calhoun, Centerville, County Barn, Currie, Erata, G.V. Harrison Multipurpose Building, Gitano, Glade School, Hebron, Johnson, Landrum Community Center, Lt. Ellis Center, Magnolia Center, Mauldin Community Center, Moselle, Myrick, North Laurel, Oak Park School, Ovett, Parkview Baptist Church, Pinegrove, Pleasant Ridge, Powers Community Center, Rainey, Rustin, Sandhill, Shelton, Soso, Tuckers, Union and West Ellisville. (2)  The boundaries of the congressional districts described in subsection (1) of this section shall be the boundaries of the counties along such congressional district boundaries as the boundaries of such counties existed on January 1, 2022, and the precinct boundaries along such congressional district boundaries as such precinct boundaries are contained in Census Bureau's P.L. 94-171 geographic support products provided for use with the September 16th data deliveries officially called the "2020 Census State Redistricting Data (Public Law 94-171) Summary Files." SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.